Wisconsin, session 2025, AB189.
do enact as follows:AB189,11Section 1. 767.127 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB189,2,72767.127 (2) Filing disclosure forms. Disclosure forms required under this 3section shall be filed within 90 days after the service of summons or the filing of a 4joint petition or at a time ordered by the court. Information on the forms shall be 5updated on the record to the date of hearing or, in the case of granting a divorce or 6legal separation based on an affidavit under s. 767.235 (1) (b), the date of the 7signing of the affidavit.AB189,28Section 2. 767.235 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 767.235 (1) (a).AB189,39Section 3. 767.235 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB189,2,1210767.235 (1) (b) Notwithstanding par. (a), a judgment of divorce or legal 11separation under s. 767.35 may be granted without a hearing before the court if all 12of the following conditions are met:AB189,2,16131. Both parties named in the action are represented by counsel or have worked 14with a lawyer mediator with special skills and training in dispute resolution who is 15registered on the case and who drafted and filed the parties’ signed stipulation 16under s. 767.34.AB189,2,18172. All parties under s. 767.205 have signed and filed a court-approved 18stipulation under s. 767.34.AB189,2,19193. Both parties have filed a stipulation for judgment upon affidavit.AB189,2,21204. Both parties have submitted an affidavit that meets all of the following 21requirements:AB189,2,2322a. The affidavit affirms or amends, if necessary, the information contained in 23the petition under s. 767.215 (2).AB189,2,2424b. The affidavit affirms the residency requirements under s. 767.301.AB189,3,11c. The affidavit asserts that the conditions under s. 767.35 (1) have been met.AB189,3,32d. The affidavit states whether either party is a member of the armed forces of 3the United States or its allies.AB189,3,44e. The affidavit states whether either party is receiving public assistance.AB189,3,65f. The affidavit affirms that both parties made the disclosures required under 6s. 767.127.AB189,3,87g. The affidavit affirms that both parties understood the terms of and entered 8freely into any stipulation filed under s. 767.34.AB189,3,109h. The affidavit requests that the court incorporate any stipulation filed 10under s. 767.34 into the judgment.AB189,3,1211i. The affidavit waives the right to a hearing in person before a court under 12par. (a) and s. 767.315.AB189,3,1413j. The affidavit states that both parties understand the requirements under s. 14767.35 (3).AB189,3,1615k. The affidavit states whether either party requests to resume a former legal 16surname, if any, under s. 767.395.AB189,3,2117L. The affidavit states whether the parties were involved in any pending or 18completed court cases in any jurisdiction where interspousal battery or domestic 19abuse, as defined in s. 813.122 (1) (a), are indicated, including petitions under s. 20813.12, 813.122, or 813.125, criminal cases alleging conduct under s. 940.19 or 21940.20, or their substantial equivalents in state, tribal, or federal court.AB189,3,2322m. The affidavit states that both parties acknowledge and understand the 23prohibition on remarriage under s. 765.03.AB189,424Section 4. 767.235 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB189,4,71767.235 (2) Appearance of litigants. Unless Except as provided under sub. 2(1) (b), or unless nonresidence in the state is shown by competent evidence, service 3is by publication, or the court for other good cause orders otherwise, both parties in 4actions affecting the family shall appear upon the final hearing or trial. An order of 5the court to that effect shall be procured by the moving party, and shall be served 6upon the nonmoving party before the hearing or trial. No order is required in the 7case of a joint petition.AB189,58Section 5. 767.315 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB189,4,159767.315 (1) (a) If both of the parties to a legal separation or divorce action by 10petition or otherwise have stated under oath or affirmation that the marriage is 11irretrievably broken, or if the parties have voluntarily lived apart continuously for 1212 months or more immediately prior to commencement of the action and one party 13has so stated, the court, after hearing, shall make a finding that the marriage is 14irretrievably broken for purposes of s. 767.35 (1) (b) 1. This paragraph may be 15satisfied by an affidavit under s. 767.235 (1) (b).AB189,616Section 6. 767.315 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB189,4,2117767.315 (2) Breakdown of marital relationship. If both of the parties to a 18legal separation or divorce action by petition or otherwise have stated under oath or 19affirmation that the marital relationship is broken, the court, after hearing, shall 20make a finding that the marital relationship is broken for purposes of s. 767.35 (1) 21(b) 2. This subsection may be satisfied by an affidavit under s. 767.235 (1) (b).AB189,722Section 7. 767.335 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB189,5,223767.335 Waiting period for final hearing or trial. (intro.) An action for 1divorce or legal separation may not be brought to final hearing or trial or granted 2based on an affidavit under s. 767.235 (1) (b) until the first of the following occurs:AB189,83Section 8. 767.35 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB189,5,94767.35 (3) When divorce judgment effective. A judgment of divorce is 5effective when granted. A court granting a judgment of divorce shall inform the 6parties appearing in court that the judgment is effective when granted but that it is 7unlawful under s. 765.03 (2) for a party to marry again until 6 months after the 8judgment is granted. This section does not prevent application of enforceable 9orders prior to the divorce judgment as set forth in s. 767.333.AB189,5,1010